Florida, session 2026, SB1654.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 91 92 Section 1.âPart III of chapter 386, Florida Statutes, 93 consisting of ss. 386.301-386.3101, Florida Statutes, is created 94 and entitled âWater Safety for Cooling Towers, Water Storage 95 Tanks, and Supplemental Disinfection Systems.â 96 Section 2.âSection 386.301, Florida Statutes, is created to 97 read: 98 386.301âLegislative purpose and intent.âThe purpose and 99 intent of this part is to protect people from the health hazards 100 of Legionella, a bacterium known to originate in improperly 101 sanitized cooling towers, domestic water holding tanks, and 102 building piping systems. 103 Section 3.âSection 386.302, Florida Statutes, is created to 104 read: 105 386.302âDefinitions.âAs used in this part, the term: 106 (1)ââBacteriological culture sampling and analysisâ means 107 the collection of a water sample for the purpose of measuring 108 the live culture growth of aerobic bacterial populations using 109 heterotrophic plate count, dip slides, or a similar method 110 employed by the industry in accordance with the manufacturerâs 111 directions for use. 112 (2)ââBuilding,â unless otherwise expressly indicated by the 113 text, means all or part of a structure, premises, or lot which 114 is used or is intended to support or shelter an occupant. 115 (3)ââCleaningâ means physical, mechanical, or other method 116 of removal of biofilm, scale, debris, rust, other corrosion 117 products, sludge, algae, or other potential sources of 118 contamination. 119 (4)ââCompliance inspectionâ means the inspection, testing, 120 and other activities required on a regular basis in accordance 121 with s. 386.308 by the Department of Agriculture and Consumer 122 Services. 123 (5)ââCooling towerâ means an evaporative condenser, a fluid 124 cooler, or other wet cooling device that is capable of 125 aerosolizing water, that contains or is part of a recirculated 126 water system, and that is incorporated into a buildingâs cooling 127 process, industrial process, refrigeration system, or energy 128 production system. 129 (6)ââCooling tower cellsâ means the smallest subdivisions 130 of a tower which can function independently with regard to air 131 and water flow. Each cell may have one or more fans and one or 132 more distribution systems. 133 (7)ââCooling tower water systemâ means one or more cooling 134 towers and all of the recirculating water system components, 135 process instruments, and appurtenances through which water flows 136 or comes into contact with chemical applicators, valves, pumps, 137 condensers, heat exchangers, and other related components. 138 (8)ââCorrective actionâ means disinfection, cleaning, 139 flushing, and other activities to remedy biofilm growth, 140 Legionella proliferation, or other system mechanical problems 141 identified through monitoring, inspections, or other means, as 142 determined by the department. 143 (9)ââCycles of concentrationâ means the ratio of make-up 144 water volume to blowdown water volume which may be approximated 145 from the ratio of the conductivity of the blowdown water to the 146 conductivity of the make-up water. 147 (10)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of Health. 148 (11)ââDip slideâ means a method to test for microorganisms 149 which consists of a sterile culture medium affixed to a sterile 150 slide that is dipped directly into the sampled liquid. 151 (12)ââDisinfectionâ means the use of one or more biocides 152 at a defined concentration, under specified conditions, for an 153 established period of time to kill or inactivate pathogenic 154 microorganisms. The term does not include the cleaning of a 155 cooling tower through the application of detergents, penetrants, 156 brushes or other tools, highly pressurized water, or any other 157 method that does not involve the use of a pesticide or economic 158 poison as defined in s. 482.021; the use of a pesticide as 159 defined in s. 487.021; or the use of a restricted-use pesticide 160 as defined in s. 487.021. 161 (13)ââDrift eliminatorâ means a system of baffles which 162 causes separation of entrained water and is designed to remove 163 aerosols from cooling tower exhaust. 164 (14)ââDomestic water holding tankâ means a fixed, enclosed, 165 above-ground or below-ground vessel that is designed, 166 constructed, and installed to store potable water intended for 167 human consumption, household use, or sanitary purposes within a 168 residential or mixed-use occupancy. 169 (15)ââHeterotrophic plate countâ means a measure of the 170 concentration of microorganisms that require an external source 171 of organic carbon for growth, including bacteria, yeasts, and 172 mold, in water samples. 173 (16)ââLegionellaâ means the genus of bacteria commonly 174 found in aqueous environments, including the recirculated water 175 of cooling tower water systems that are not properly or 176 regularly maintained. 177 (17)ââLegionella culture sampling and analysisâ means the 178 collection of a water sample for the measurement of the live 179 culture of Legionella involving the use of specialized media and 180 laboratory methods for growth to determine the species and 181 serogroup. 182 (18)ââMaintenance program and planâ means a written 183 document, developed by a qualified person, which specifies 184 required monitoring, cleaning, disinfection, and other practices 185 for the prevention and control of Legionella growth in a cooling 186 tower water system, and is in accordance with sections 5, 6, and 187 7.2 of ANSI/ASHRAE Standard 188-2018, Legionellosis: Risk 188 Management for Building Water Systems and the manufacturerâs 189 instructions. 190 (19)ââOwnerâ means all of the following: 191 (a)âA person, an agent, a firm, a partnership, a 192 corporation, or other legal entity that has a legal or equitable 193 interest in, or control of, a cooling tower or the premises of a 194 cooling tower. 195 (b)âThe legal owner of the building. 196 (c)âA tenant, if the tenant: 197 1.âOwns a cooling tower that services the tenantâs leased 198 premises; or 199 2.âDoes not own the cooling tower but has a lease or 200 contractual arrangement to maintain the cooling tower. 201 (20)ââQualified personâ means a professional engineer 202 licensed and registered in this state, including a 12080 203 Certified - Legionella Water Safety and Management Specialist; 204 Department of Environmental Protection licensed Water Treatment 205 Operator Class D or higher; a certified industrial hygienist; a 206 certified water technologist; a professional with training and 207 experience in developing management plans and performing 208 inspections in accordance with industry protocols, including, 209 but not limited to, NSF Protocol 453-2017: Cooling Towers â 210 Treatment, Operation, and Maintenance to Prevent Legionellosis; 211 or an environmental consultant who has at least 2 years of 212 operational experience in water management planning and 213 operation. 214 (21)ââSupplemental disinfection systemâ is a permanently 215 installed treatment system designed to provide additional 216 microbial protection for potable water supplied to a residence 217 or residential facility. The system functions as an added 218 barrier to inactivate or remove pathogenic microorganisms that 219 may be present in the incoming water supply or that may 220 proliferate within onsite plumbing, storage, or distribution 221 components. Such systems include, but are not limited to, 222 chlorine, chlorine dioxide or monochloramine for chlorination or 223 chloramine injection systems, and disinfection processes 224 approved for potable water use in this state by the Department 225 of Environmental Protection. Such system must be constructed of 226 materials certified for contact with drinking water and designed 227 to operate within the manufacturerâs specified flow, pressure, 228 and water quality parameters. The system must be installed in 229 accordance with all applicable plumbing, electrical, and public 230 health codes and must incorporate appropriate monitoring, 231 control, and safety features, including alarms, dosage controls, 232 fail-safe shutdown mechanisms, and provisions to prevent 233 contamination or backflow into the potable water supply. Such 234 systems are intended to enhance microbial safety, reduce the 235 risk of waterborne illness, and maintain disinfectant residual 236 or pathogen inactivation performance throughout the water 237 distribution network. 238 Section 4.âSection 386.303, Florida Statutes, is created to 239 read: 240 386.303âRegistration; reporting; recordkeeping.â 241 (1)âREGISTRATION.âBefore initial operation, and upon any 242 change in ownership, the owner of a cooling tower shall register 243 its cooling towers, domestic water tanks, or supplemental 244 disinfection water systems with the department using a statewide 245 electronic system designated by the department. The registration 246 system must, at a minimum, require all of the following 247 information: 248 (a)âThe street address of the building where the cooling 249 tower is located. 250 (b)âThe name, address, telephone number, and e-mail address 251 of each cooling tower owner. 252 (c)âThe total number of cooling towers, tanks, and 253 supplemental disinfection systems. 254 (d)âThe name of the manufacturer of the system. 255 (e)âThe model number of the system. 256 (f)âThe specific unit serial number of the system, if 257 available. 258 (g)âThe cooling capacity of the cooling tower in tons, 259 holding tank volume in gallons, and total yearly treated gallons 260 for supplemental disinfection systems. 261 (h)âThe cooling tower water system volume, inclusive of any 262 piping, basin, or sump. 263 (i)âThe intended use of the cooling tower. 264 (j)âWhether systematic disinfection in accordance with s. 265 386.307 is maintained manually, through timed injection, or 266 through continuous delivery. 267 (k)âWhether maintenance is performed by an employee, a 268 contractor, or other party. 269 (l)âThe year the cooling tower was placed into service. 270 (2)âREPORTING.â 271 (a)âBeginning July 1, 2027, a cooling tower, domestic water 272 holding tank, or supplemental disinfection system owner shall 273 report through the statewide electronic system all of the 274 following information to the department at least every 90 days 275 while the cooling tower or domestic tank is in use: 276 1.âThe date of the last bacteriological culture sample 277 collection, the results of the analysis, and the designated due 278 date of any remedial action required pursuant to s. 279 386.304(2)(e). 280 2.âThe date of the last Legionella culture sample 281 collection, the results of the sample analysis, and the date 282 that any remedial action was taken as required by s. 283 386.304(2)(e). 284 3.âThe date of the last compliance inspection performed 285 pursuant to s. 386.308 and the resulting standardized inspection 286 report. 287 4.âThe date of the lowest daily cycles of concentration 288 recorded and the target number of cycles. 289 5.âThe average daily make-up water volume and blowdown 290 water volume. 291 6.âThe percentage of make-up water delivered to the cooling 292 tower versus the blowdown water volume. 293 7.âThe date of the most recent certification pursuant to s. 294 386.308. 295 8.âThe date of removal or permanent discontinuation of use 296 of the cooling tower, if applicable. 297 9.âAny other information deemed necessary by the 298 department. 299 (b)âIf a landlord and tenant are considered to be owners of 300 a cooling tower as defined in s. 386.302, only one of the 301 parties is required to register the cooling tower. However, both 302 parties are responsible for ensuring that registration and 303 reporting are completed as required by this part. 304 (3)âSTATEWIDE SYSTEM.â 305 (a)âThe department shall make the data in the statewide 306 electronic system: 307 1.âPublicly available, as appropriate; and 308 2.âFully accessible to and searchable by county health 309 departments. 310 (b)âThis part does not prohibit a county health department 311 or the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services from 312 requiring registration with and reporting to a county system or 313 collecting fees associated with the administration of such a 314 system. 315 (c)âThe department shall provide owners with a mobile data 316 collection platform that is compatible with Android and Apple 317 devices and that electronically collects, and allows owners to 318 electronically submit, the information required by this part. 319 (4)âRECORDKEEPING.âA cooling tower owner shall: 320 (a)âMaintain for at least 3 years all of the following 321 records: 322 1.âRequired sampling and analyses. 323 2.âDisinfection schedules and applications. 324 3.âInspection findings, deficiencies, and corrective 325 actions. 326 4.âRequired certifications. 327 (b)âMaintain on the premises of the cooling tower a copy of 328 the current maintenance program and plan required by this part. 329 (c)âMake the records and plan required under this 330 subsection immediately available to the department or county 331 health department upon request. 332 Section 5.âSection 386.304, Florida Statutes, is created to 333 read: 334 386.304âMaintenance program and plan.â 335 (1)âThe owner of a cooling tower shall: 336 (a)âBy September 1, 2027, develop or update a maintenance 337 program and plan for each existing cooling tower which must be 338 consistent with section 7.2 of ANSI/ASHRAE Standard 188-2018, 339 Legionellosis: Risk Management for Building Water Systems. 340 (b)âAfter September 1, 2027, maintain such a maintenance 341 program and plan for each newly installed cooling tower. 342 (2)âThe maintenance program and plan must include all of 343 the following elements: 344 (a)âA schedule for routine bacteriological culture sampling 345 and analysis to assess microbiological activity. The sampling 346 and analysis must be conducted at intervals of not more than 28 347 days while the cooling tower is in use and must require 348 additional bacteriological culture sampling and analysis, as 349 needed, to validate process adjustments. 350 (b)âA schedule for routine Legionella culture sampling and 351 analysis within 14 days after startup and, thereafter, while the 352 cooling tower is in use, at monthly intervals. For cooling 353 towers in use year-round, the sampling and analysis must be 354 conducted at intervals of not more than 30 days and within 2 355 weeks after startup following maintenance. 356 (c)âA procedure for achieving water efficiency by 357 maintaining a minimum of 3 cycles of concentration using 358 automatic conductivity control or for estimating the percentage 359 of water savings through the installation of water meters on 360 make-up and blowdown lines. 361 (d)âA requirement that, in addition to development of the 362 routine Legionella culture sampling and analysis schedule 363 required by paragraph (b), immediate Legionella culture sampling 364 and analysis be conducted in the event of any of the following: 365 1.âA mechanical breakdown of the cooling tower water system 366 for more than 72 hours. 367 2.âA power failure affecting the cooling tower water system 368 for more than 72 hours. 369 3.âA loss of the biocide treatment system of the cooling 370 tower water system for more than 72 hours. 371 4.âFailure of conductivity control or any other control 372 methods for more than 72 hours. 373 5.âA determination by the department or a county health 374 department that one or more cases of legionellosis are or may be 375 associated with the cooling tower, based on epidemiologic data 376 or laboratory testing. 377 6.âAny other condition specified by the department or a 378 county health department. 379 (e)âA requirement that an owner take immediate and 380 appropriate action, including remedial action, in response to a 381 bacteriological or Legionella culture analysis. For 382 bacteriological analysis results, the response must include, but 383 need not be limited to, taking action as required by s. 384 386.305(2). For Legionella culture analysis results, the 385 response must include, but need not be limited to, taking action 386 as required by s. 386.305(3) and contacting the county health 387 department as required by s. 386.306. 388 (f)âA requirement that any Legionella culture analyses be 389 performed pursuant to s. 386.305(1). 390 (g)âA shutdown and disinfection plan for removing or 391 permanently discontinuing use of a cooling tower. 392 (h)âRequirements for the treatment and manual or automated 393 flushing of any piping, basin, sump, or wetted surface during 394 idle conditions. 395 Section 6.âSection 386.305, Florida Statutes, is created to 396 read: 397 386.305âCulture analyses.â 398 (1)âLABORATORY REQUIREMENTS.âA culture analysis must be 399 performed by an environmental laboratory that is certified 400 pursuant to s. 403.0625 and is approved to perform such an 401 analysis. 402 (2)âINTERPRETATION OF BACTERIOLOGICAL ANALYSIS RESULTS FROM 403 COOLING TOWERS.â 404 (a)âLevel 1.âSamples with a culture result less than 10,000 405 colony-forming units per milliliter (CFU/mL). The cooling tower 406 owner must maintain the cooling towerâs treatment program and 407 bacteriological monitoring in accordance with the cooling 408 towerâs maintenance program and plan. 409 (b)âLevel 2.âSamples with a culture result greater than or 410 equal to 10,000 CFU/mL but less than 100,000 CFU/mL. The cooling 411 tower owner must do all of the following until the water sample 412 culture results meet the Level 1 criteria: 413 1.âReview the treatment program. 414 2.âInitiate immediate disinfection by either increasing 415 biocide concentration or using a different biocide within 24 416 hours after receiving the analysis results. 417 3.âRetest the water within 3 to 7 days after receiving the 418 analysis results. 419 (c)âLevel 3.âSamples with a culture result greater than or 420 equal to 100,000 CFU/mL but less than 1 million CFU/mL. The 421 cooling tower owner must do all of the following until the water 422 sample culture results meet the Level 1 criteria: 423 1.âReview the treatment program and provide notification as 424 required by s. 386.306. 425 2.âIncrease biocides within 24 hours after receiving the 426 analysis results. 427 3.âPerform a visual inspection to evaluate the need to 428 perform cleaning and additional disinfection. 429 4.âRetest the water within 3 to 7 days after receiving the 430 analysis results. 431 (d)âLevel 4.âSamples with a culture result greater than or 432 equal to 1 million CFU/mL. The cooling tower owner must do all 433 of the following until the water sample culture results meet the 434 Level 1 criteria: 435 1.âReview the treatment program and provide notification as 436 required by s. 386.306. 437 2.âIncrease biocides within 2 hours after receiving the 438 analysis results. 439 3.âWithin 48 hours after receiving the analysis results, 440 perform remediation of the tower by hyperhalogenating, cleaning, 441 and flushing the tower. 442 4.âRetest the water within 3 to 7 days after receiving the 443 analysis results. 444 (3)âINTERPRETATION OF LEGIONELLA CULTURE RESULTS FROM 445 COOLING TOWERS.â 446 (a)âLevel 1.âLegionella culture sample results of less than 447 20 CFU/mL. The cooling tower owner must maintain the treatment 448 program and monitoring in accordance with the cooling towerâs 449 maintenance program and plan. 450 (b)âLevel 2.âLegionella culture sample results of more than 451 or equal to 20 CFU/mL but less than 1,000 CFU/mL. The cooling 452 tower owner must do all of the following until the water sample 453 culture results meet the Level 1 criteria: 454 1.âReview the treatment program. 455 2.âPerform immediate online disinfection. 456 3.âRetest the water within 3 to 7 days after receiving the 457 analysis results. 458 a.âIf the retest indicates a presence of Legionella of more 459 than or equal to 20 CFU/mL but less than 100 CFU/mL, the cooling 460 tower owner must repeat the online disinfection. 461 b.âIf the subsequent retest indicates a presence of 462 Legionella of more than or equal to 100 CFU/mL but less than 463 1,000 CFU/mL, the cooling tower owner must further investigate 464 the water treatment program and immediately perform online 465 disinfection. 466 (c)âLevel 3.âLegionella culture sample results of more than 467 or equal to 1,000 CFU/mL. The cooling tower owner must do all of 468 the following until the water sample culture results meet the 469 Level 1 criteria: 470 1.âReview the treatment program. 471 2.âProvide notification as required by s. 386.306. 472 3.âInstitute immediate system decontamination. 473 4.âRetest the water within 3 to 7 days after receiving the 474 analysis results. 475 a.âIf the retest indicates a presence of Legionella of more 476 than or equal to 20 CFU/mL but less than 1,000 CFU/mL, the 477 cooling tower owner must take the actions required under 478 paragraph (b). 479 b.âIf the subsequent retest indicates a presence of 480 Legionella of more than or equal to 1,000 CFU/mL, the owner must 481 perform system decontamination. 482 Section 7.âSection 386.306, Florida Statutes, is created to 483 read: 484 386.306âNotification.âA cooling tower owner shall: 485 (1)âNotify the county health department within 24 hours 486 after receiving a Legionella water sample culture result that 487 exceeds 1,000 colony-forming units per milliliter. The county 488 health department shall notify the department within 24 hours 489 after receiving such a report. 490 (2)âNotify the public of such test results in a manner 491 determined by the county health department or, at the discretion 492 of the department. 493 Section 8.âSection 386.307, Florida Statutes, is created to 494 read: 495 386.307âCooling tower standards.â 496 (1)âDISINFECTION.â 497 (a)âA person who disinfects a cooling tower must be a 498 commercial applicator or a certified applicator, as those terms 499 are defined in s. 487.021, who is licensed to apply biocide in a 500 cooling tower and who is certified in accordance with the 501 requirements of the Florida Pesticide Law or be an apprentice 502 who is under the direct supervision of a licensed applicator as 503 defined in s. 487.021. 504 (b)âThe cooling tower owner shall maintain the name and 505 certification number of the applicator who disinfects the 506 cooling tower under paragraph (a) or the business name and 507 telephone number of the company providing online disinfection. 508 (c)âOnly biocide products registered by the Department of 509 Environmental Protection for use in cooling towers or pesticidal 510 devices produced in an establishment registered by the United 511 States Environmental Protection Agency may be used to disinfect 512 a cooling tower. 513 (2)âEFFICIENCY.â 514 (a)âEach cooling tower owner shall install make-up and 515 blowdown meters on its cooling towers to monitor the total 516 volume of water used by the cooling tower and shall ensure that 517 the cooling tower has an automatic conductivity controller, a 518 high-efficiency drift eliminator, and an overflow alarm to 519 prevent overflow of the sump in case of make-up water valve 520 failure. The overflow alarm must provide an alert through an 521 energy management control system to the cooling tower operators 522 in the event of an overflow of the sump. 523 (b)âAll cooling towers must achieve at least eight cycles 524 of concentration using automatic conductivity control. 525 (c)âThe efficiency of the cooling tower water system must 526 be measured by the percentage of water delivered to the cooling 527 tower versus the blowdown water volume. 528 (d)âIf the local water utility supplies water to the 529 property, water meters must meet the requirements of the 530 utility. 531 Section 9.âSection 386.308, Florida Statutes, is created to 532 read: 533 386.308âCompliance inspection and certification.â 534 (1)âCOMPLIANCE INSPECTION.â 535 (a)âEach cooling tower owner must ensure that its cooling 536 towers are inspected before initial startup and at intervals of 537 not more than every 90 days while in use. 538 (b)âA compliance inspection must be performed by a 539 qualified person who is unaffiliated with the water treatment 540 company, a professional engineer licensed in this state, an 541 industrial hygienist, a water technologist, or an environmental 542 consultant. Any of the aforementioned persons must have training 543 and experience in performing inspections in accordance with 544 current standard industry protocols, including, but not limited 545 to, ANSI/ASHRAE Standard 188-2018, Legionellosis: Risk 546 Management for Building Water Systems. 547 (c)âEach compliance inspection must include an evaluation 548 on a standardized inspection form created by the department of 549 all of the following: 550 1.âThe cooling tower and associated equipment for measuring 551 the presence of organic material, biofilm, algae, debris, and 552 other visible contaminants. 553 2.âThe general condition of the cooling tower basin, remote 554 sump, packing material, and drift eliminators. 555 3.âThe water make-up connections and control, including 556 backflow protection or air gaps, as needed. 557 4.âWhether the conductivity control and the make-up and 558 blowdown meters are functioning properly. 559 5.âWhether the water treatment equipment, including, but 560 not limited to, smart controllers, probes, pumps, timers, 561 valves, and strain gauges, are functioning properly or are 562 properly calibrated, as appropriate. 563 (d)âInformation collected during compliance inspections 564 must be entered into the departmentâs mobile data collection 565 platform, must include the standardized inspection form, and 566 must be submitted to the registration portal by a qualified 567 person as specified in paragraph (b). 568 (e)âThe person performing the inspection shall report all 569 deficiencies found to the owner so that corrective action may be 570 taken and document all completed corrective actions using the 571 departmentâs mobile data collection platform. 572 (2)âCERTIFICATION.âBy November 1, 2026, and by each 573 November 1 thereafter, a cooling tower owner shall obtain an 574 annual certification from a qualified person which certifies 575 that a maintenance program and plan is in place for the cooling 576 tower and that all actions required under that plan and this 577 part have been taken, including, but not limited to, all of the 578 following: 579 (a)âAll required bacteriological culture sampling and 580 analyses. 581 (b)âAll Legionella culture sampling and analyses, including 582 any immediate Legionella culture sampling and analyses performed 583 pursuant to s. 386.304(2)(d) and (e). 584 (c)âAny disinfection performed pursuant to the standards 585 specified in s. 386.307(1). 586 (d)âAll compliance inspections performed pursuant to 587 subsection (1). 588 (3)âREPORTING.âAll inspection findings, deficiencies, 589 corrective actions, and certifications must be reported to the 590 department by the owner, and copies of such must be maintained 591 on the premises as required by s. 386.303. 592 Section 10.âSection 386.309, Florida Statutes, is created 593 to read: 594 386.309âEnforcement.â 595 (1)âThe department or a county health department may 596 require an owner to conduct Legionella culture sampling and 597 analysis following a determination that, based on epidemiologic 598 data or laboratory testing, one or more cases of legionellosis 599 are or may be associated with a cooling tower. 600 (2)âAn officer, employee, or agent of the department or the 601 county health department may enter onto any property to inspect 602 a cooling tower for compliance with this part and may take water 603 samples as part of such inspection. Such inspections must be 604 conducted as provided in s. 487.071. 605 (3)âIf an owner fails to register a cooling tower, develop 606 and maintain a maintenance program and plan for a cooling tower, 607 obtain certification for a cooling tower, disinfect a cooling 608 tower, perform or obtain required culture sampling and analysis, 609 or conduct inspections of a cooling tower as required in this 610 part, the department or the county health department may 611 determine that such failure constitutes a nuisance pursuant to 612 this chapter. 613 (4)âAn owner who violates this part is subject to civil and 614 criminal penalties as provided in s. 386.051. Each day that an 615 owner remains in violation of this part constitutes a separate 616 offense. 617 (5)âThe State Surgeon General shall submit a report to the 618 President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of 619 Representatives by each January 1 which includes all of the 620 following information: 621 (a)âFor the prior year: 622 1.âThe number of new cooling tower registrations issued and 623 the number of notifications of discontinued use of a cooling 624 tower received by the department as of November 1, pursuant to 625 s. 386.303. 626 2.âThe number of annual certifications issued for cooling 627 towers inspected, tested, cleaned, and disinfected which have 628 been received by the department as of November 1, pursuant to s. 629 386.308. 630 3.âThe number of reports of tests for the presence of 631 Legionella which reported levels above 1,000 CFU/mL received by 632 the department. 633 4.âThe number of inspections of cooling towers conducted by 634 the department, or a county health department on behalf of the 635 department, along with the number and types of violations cited 636 during such inspections. 637 5.âThe number of cleanings, disinfections, or other actions 638 performed by or on behalf of the department. 639 6.âThe number of persons diagnosed with legionellosis in 640 this state, to the extent known or reasonably discoverable by 641 the department. 642 (b)âRecommendations as to whether department rules should 643 be amended to include requirements for any of the building water 644 systems described in ANSI/ASHRAE Standard 188-2018, 645 Legionellosis: Risk Management for Building Water Systems. 646 (c)âInformation regarding the implementation of any such 647 requirement, the effectiveness of the requirement in preventing 648 outbreaks of legionellosis, and recommendations for improvements 649 or modifications to department rules to further the control of 650 Legionella. 651 Section 11.âSection 386.3101, Florida Statutes, is created 652 to read: 653 386.3101âWaivers.âThe department may issue a written 654 general or specific waiver with respect to registration, 655 certification, or reporting requirements established in this 656 part if the department determines that such waiver will not 657 present a danger to public health. The department may revoke the 658 waiver upon a determination that the waiver may present a danger 659 to public health. 660 Section 12.âUntil December 31, 2027, an owner may submit a 661 written application to a county health department for a variance 662 from any requirement of this part for additional time to comply 663 with this act. A variance may not exceed 90 days. The 664 application must include an explanation as to why the variance 665 will not present a danger to public health. With the approval of 666 the Department of Health, the county health department may 667 approve such application for a variance, in writing, subject to 668 any condition that the department or county health department 669 may deem appropriate to protect public health. The department or 670 the county health department may revoke a variance upon a 671 determination that the variance may present a danger to public 672 health. 673 Section 13.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.